Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 13. Contracts with the United States.

§ 77-5-601.
Contracts with United States for acquisition of electrical system and purchase or sale of electricity authorized.

Any municipal corporation, county, city, town, or village, power district or improvement authority, hereinafter called “municipality,” owning and/or operating or hereafter authorized to acquire and/or operate any electric generation, transmission and/or distribution system, is hereby authorized to contract with the United States of America, any agency thereof, or with any corporation owned by the United States for the acquisition of any such system or part thereof and/or the purchase or sale of electric energy. Such municipality is authorized in any such contract to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms, and conditions as the governing body or board of the municipality may deem appropriate, including but without limitation, covenants, terms and conditions with respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, service, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposing of the revenues, of any such system, and to comply therewith. Any such contract heretofore entered into and any such covenants, terms or conditions heretofore stipulated or agreed to are hereby expressly validated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5552; Laws, 1936, ch. 271.

§ 77-5-603.
Article cumulative and supplemental; construction of article.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any authority, power or right which any municipality may have in the absence hereof. This article shall be construed as cumulative and shall be in addition and supplemental to any power, authority or right conferred by any other law.

This article is remedial in nature and any power, authority or right hereby conferred shall be liberally construed, and to this end every municipality shall have the power, authority and right, in addition to those expressly conferred hereby, to do all things necessary or convenient in carrying out the purposes hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5552; Laws, 1936, ch. 271.